Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2487.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6334.2. Information for school districts.(a) Regulation.--The department shall promulgate regulations and establish procedures for best practices for the county agency to notify a school building principal, a certified school guidance counselor or an identified mental health professional when a student at that school building is engaged in a traumatic event. A traumatic event shall be defined as an event which induces trauma as defined under section 102 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(b) Confidential information.--The department and the county 123456789101112131415161718 agency may not share confidential information relating to the student, but the county agency shall inform the school building principal, a certified school guidance counselor or an identified mental health professional through written or electronic communication for the purpose of monitoring the student for additional support needs that the county agency is aware that the student attends the school and was recently involved in a traumatic event.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2487PN3359 - 2 - 123456789